Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-1007
Ballots; write-in votes; last name only; rejected, when.

(1) If the last name of a person engaged in or pursuing a write-in campaign pursuant to section 32-615 is the same or substantially similar to the last name of another person engaged in or pursuing a write-in campaign for the same office or a candidate appearing on the ballot for the same office, the write-in vote shall be valid only if, in addition to the requirements of section 32-1005, the first or generally recognized name of the person engaged in or pursuing the write-in campaign is also written or printed on the line provided for that purpose.

(2) If only the last name of a person is in the write-in space on the ballot and the last name is the same or substantially similar to the last name of another person engaged in or pursuing a write-in campaign for the same office or a candidate appearing on the ballot for the same office, the counting board shall reject the ballot for that office.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 301;

Laws 1999, LB 571, § 10;

Laws 2001, LB 252, § 3;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 33;

Laws 2013, LB349, § 5;

Laws 2018, LB377, § 4;

Laws 2019, LB411, § 52;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 67.